Florida, session 2026, HB17.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
23
24 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Officer Jason
25 Raynor Act."
Page 1 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
26 Section 2. Section 776.051, Florida Statutes, is amended
27 to read:
28 776.051 Use or threatened use of force in resisting arrest
29 or detention making an arrest or in the execution of a legal
30 duty; prohibition.—
31 (1) A person is not justified in the use or threatened use
32 of force to resist any an arrest or detention by a law
33 enforcement officer, or to resist a law enforcement officer who
34 is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties as
35 described in s. 943.10(1) execution of a legal duty, if the law
36 enforcement officer was acting in good faith and he or she is
37 known, or reasonably appears, to be a law enforcement officer.
38 As used in this section, the term "acting in good faith" means
39 to make sincere and reasonable efforts to comply with legal
40 requirements, even if the arrest, detention, or other act is
41 later found to have been unlawful.
42 (2) A law enforcement officer, or any person whom the
43 officer has summoned or directed to assist him or her, is not
44 justified in the use of force if the arrest or execution of a
45 legal duty is unlawful and known by him or her to be unlawful.
46 Section 3. Section 782.065, Florida Statutes, is amended
47 to read:
48 782.065 Murder; law enforcement officer, correctional
49 officer, correctional probation officer.—Notwithstanding ss.
50 775.082, 775.0823, 782.04, 782.051, and chapter 921, a defendant
Page 2 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
51 must shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without eligibility
52 for release upon findings by the trier of fact that, beyond a
53 reasonable doubt:
54 (1) The defendant committed murder in the first degree in
55 violation of s. 782.04(1) and a death sentence was not imposed;
56 murder in the second or third degree in violation of s.
57 782.04(2), (3), or (4); attempted murder in the first or second
58 degree in violation of s. 782.04(1)(a)1. or (2); or attempted
59 felony murder in violation of s. 782.051; or manslaughter in
60 violation of s. 782.07(1); and
61 (2) The victim of any offense described in subsection (1)
62 was a law enforcement officer, part-time law enforcement
63 officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, correctional
64 officer, part-time correctional officer, auxiliary correctional
65 officer, correctional probation officer, part-time correctional
66 probation officer, or auxiliary correctional probation officer,
67 as those terms are defined in s. 943.10, who was engaged in the
68 performance of his or her official duties as described in s.
69 943.10 lawful performance of a legal duty.
70 Section 4. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) and subsection
71 (2) of section 784.07, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
72 784.07 Assault or battery of law enforcement officers and
73 other specified personnel; reclassification of offenses; minimum
74 sentences.—
75 (1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 3 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
76 (e) "Law enforcement officer" includes a law enforcement
77 officer, a correctional officer, a correctional probation
78 officer, a part-time law enforcement officer, a part-time
79 correctional officer, an auxiliary law enforcement officer, and
80 an auxiliary correctional officer, as those terms are
81 respectively defined in s. 943.10, and any county probation
82 officer; an employee or agent of the Department of Corrections
83 who supervises or provides services to inmates; an officer of
84 the Florida Commission on Offender Review; a federal law
85 enforcement officer as defined in s. 901.1505; and law
86 enforcement personnel of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
87 Commission, the Department of Environmental Protection, or the
88 Department of Law Enforcement. The duties and responsibilities
89 of these respective positions are described in s. 943.10.
90 (2) Whenever any person is charged with knowingly
91 committing an assault or battery upon a law enforcement officer,
92 a firefighter, an emergency medical care provider, hospital
93 personnel, a railroad special officer, a traffic accident
94 investigation officer as described in s. 316.640, a nonsworn law
95 enforcement agency employee who is certified as an agency
96 inspector, a blood alcohol analyst, or a breath test operator
97 while such employee is in uniform and engaged in processing,
98 testing, evaluating, analyzing, or transporting a person who is
99 detained or under arrest for DUI, a law enforcement explorer, a
100 traffic infraction enforcement officer as described in s.
Page 4 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
101 316.640, a parking enforcement specialist as defined in s.
102 316.640, a person licensed as a security officer as defined in
103 s. 493.6101 and wearing a uniform that bears at least one patch
104 or emblem that is visible at all times that clearly identifies
105 the employing agency and that clearly identifies the person as a
106 licensed security officer, a security officer employed by the
107 board of trustees of a community college, or a utility worker
108 engaged in work on critical infrastructure as defined in s.
109 812.141(1), while the officer, firefighter, emergency medical
110 care provider, hospital personnel, railroad special officer,
111 traffic accident investigation officer, traffic infraction
112 enforcement officer, inspector, analyst, operator, law
113 enforcement explorer, parking enforcement specialist, public
114 transit employee or agent, security officer, or utility worker
115 is engaged in the lawful performance of his or her official
116 duties, the offense for which the person is charged shall be
117 reclassified as follows:
118 (a) In the case of assault, from a misdemeanor of the
119 second degree to a misdemeanor of the first degree.
120 (b) In the case of battery, from a misdemeanor of the
121 first degree to a felony of the third degree. Notwithstanding
122 any other provision of law, a person convicted of battery upon a
123 law enforcement officer committed in furtherance of a riot or an
124 aggravated riot prohibited under s. 870.01 shall be sentenced to
125 a minimum term of imprisonment of 6 months.
Page 5 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
126 (c) In the case of aggravated assault, from a felony of
127 the third degree to a felony of the second degree.
128 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted
129 of aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer shall be
130 sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 3 years.
131 (d) In the case of aggravated battery, from a felony of
132 the second degree to a felony of the first degree.
133 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted
134 of aggravated battery of a law enforcement officer shall be
135 sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 5 years.
136 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 843.01, Florida
137 Statutes, is amended to read:
138 843.01 Resisting, obstructing, or opposing by offering or
139 doing violence to legally authorized person, police canine, or
140 police horse.—
141 (1) Whoever knowingly and willfully resists, obstructs, or
142 opposes any officer as defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6),
143 (7), (8), or (9); member of the Florida Commission on Offender
144 Review or any administrative aide or supervisor employed by the
145 commission; parole and probation supervisor; county probation
146 officer; personnel or representative of the Department of Law
147 Enforcement; or other person legally authorized to execute
148 process in the execution of legal process or engaged in the
149 performance of his or her official duties as described in s.
150 943.10 lawful execution of any legal duty, by offering or doing
Page 6 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
151 violence to the person of such officer or legally authorized
152 person, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
153 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
154 Section 6. Paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (3) of
155 section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
156 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
157 ranking chart.—
158 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
159 (d) LEVEL 4
160
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
161
104.155 3rd Unqualified noncitizen electors
voting; aiding or soliciting
noncitizen electors in voting.
162
499.0051(1) 3rd Failure to maintain or deliver
transaction history,
transaction information, or
transaction statements.
163
499.0051(5) 2nd Knowing sale or delivery, or
possession with intent to sell,
contraband prescription drugs.
Page 7 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
164
517.07(1) 3rd Failure to register securities.
165
517.12(1) 3rd Failure of dealer or associated
person of a dealer of
securities to register.
166
784.031 3rd Battery by strangulation.
167
784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement
officer, firefighter, etc.
168
784.074(1)(c) 3rd Battery of sexually violent
predators facility staff.
169
784.075 3rd Battery on detention or
commitment facility staff.
170
784.078 3rd Battery of facility employee by
throwing, tossing, or expelling
certain fluids or materials.
171
784.08(2)(c) 3rd Battery on a person 65 years of
age or older.
172
Page 8 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
784.081(3) 3rd Battery on specified official
or employee.
173
784.082(3) 3rd Battery by detained person on
visitor or other detainee.
174
784.083(3) 3rd Battery on code inspector.
175
784.085 3rd Battery of child by throwing,
tossing, projecting, or
expelling certain fluids or
materials.
176
787.03(1) 3rd Interference with custody;
wrongly takes minor from
appointed guardian.
177
787.04(2) 3rd Take, entice, or remove child
beyond state limits with
criminal intent pending custody
proceedings.
178
787.04(3) 3rd Carrying child beyond state
lines with criminal intent to
avoid producing child at
Page 9 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
custody hearing or delivering
to designated person.
179
787.07 3rd Human smuggling.
180
790.115(1) 3rd Exhibiting firearm or weapon
within 1,000 feet of a school.
181
790.115(2)(b) 3rd Possessing electric weapon or
device, destructive device, or
other weapon on school
property.
182
790.115(2)(c) 3rd Possessing firearm on school
property.
183
794.051(1) 3rd Indecent, lewd, or lascivious
touching of certain minors.
184
800.04(7)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender less than 18 years.
185
806.135 2nd Destroying or demolishing a
memorial or historic property.
186
Page 10 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
810.02(4)(a) 3rd Burglary, or attempted
burglary, of an unoccupied
structure; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
187
810.02(4)(b) 3rd Burglary, or attempted
burglary, of an unoccupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
188
810.06 3rd Burglary; possession of tools.
189
810.08(2)(c) 3rd Trespass on property, armed
with firearm or dangerous
weapon.
190
810.145(3)(b) 3rd Digital voyeurism
dissemination.
191
812.014(2)(c)3. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree $10,000
or more but less than $20,000.
192
812.014 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree;
(2)(c)4. & specified items.
6.-10.
Page 11 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
193
812.014(2)(d)2. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $750
or more taken from dwelling or
its unenclosed curtilage.
194
812.014(2)(e)3. 3rd Petit theft, 1st degree; less
than $40 taken from dwelling or
its unenclosed curtilage with
two or more prior theft
convictions.
195
812.0195(2) 3rd Dealing in stolen property by
use of the Internet; property
stolen $300 or more.
196
817.505(4)(a) 3rd Patient brokering.
197
817.563(1) 3rd Sell or deliver substance other
than controlled substance
agreed upon, excluding s.
893.03(5) drugs.
198
817.568(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information.
199
Page 12 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
817.5695(3)(c) 3rd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value less
than $10,000.
200
817.625(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of scanning
device, skimming device, or
reencoder.
201
817.625(2)(c) 3rd Possess, sell, or deliver
skimming device.
202
828.125(1) 2nd Kill, maim, or cause great
bodily harm or permanent
breeding disability to any
registered horse or cattle.
203
836.14(2) 3rd Person who commits theft of a
sexually explicit image with
intent to promote it.
204
836.14(3) 3rd Person who willfully possesses
a sexually explicit image with
certain knowledge, intent, and
purpose.
205
Page 13 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
837.02(1) 3rd Perjury in official
proceedings.
206
837.021(1) 3rd Make contradictory statements
in official proceedings.
207
838.022 3rd Official misconduct.
208
839.13(2)(a) 3rd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency.
209
839.13(2)(c) 3rd Falsifying records of the
Department of Children and
Families.
210
843.021 3rd Possession of a concealed
handcuff key by a person in
custody.
211
843.025 3rd Deprive law enforcement,
correctional, or correctional
probation officer of means of
protection or communication.
212
Page 14 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
843.15(1)(a) 3rd Failure to appear while on bail
for felony (bond estreature or
bond jumping).
213
843.19(2) 2nd Injure, disable, or kill
police, fire, or SAR canine or
police horse.
214
847.0135(5)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender less
than 18 years.
215
870.01(3) 2nd Aggravated rioting.
216
870.01(5) 2nd Aggravated inciting a riot.
217
874.05(1)(a) 3rd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang.
218
893.13(2)(a)1. 2nd Purchase of cocaine (or other
s. 893.03(1)(a), (b), or (d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
219
Page 15 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
914.14(2) 3rd Witnesses accepting bribes.
220
914.22(1) 3rd Force, threaten, etc., witness,
victim, or informant.
221
914.23(2) 3rd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, no bodily
injury.
222
916.1085 3rd Introduction of specified
(2)(c)1. contraband into certain DCF
facilities.
223
934.215 3rd Use of two-way communications
device to facilitate commission
of a crime.
224
944.47(1)(a)6. 3rd Introduction of contraband
(cellular telephone or other
portable communication device)
into correctional institution.
225
951.22(1)(h), 3rd Intoxicating drug,
(j) & (k) instrumentality or other device
to aid escape, or cellular
Page 16 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
telephone or other portable
communication device introduced
into county detention facility.
226
227 (e) LEVEL 5
228
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
229
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
230
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
231
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
232
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
Page 17 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
vehicle with suspended license,
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
233
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
234
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
235
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
Page 18 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
tags; possession of forged,
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
236
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
237
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
238
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
239
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
240
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
241
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
Page 19 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
misleading, or incomplete
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
242
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
243
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
244
784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement
officer, firefighter, etc.
245
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
246
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
247
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, or use of firearms
Page 20 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
in violent manner.
248
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
249
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
250
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
251
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
252
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
253
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
254
Page 21 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
255
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
256
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
257
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
258
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
259
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
260
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
261
Page 22 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
262
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
263
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
264
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
265
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
266
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
267
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
$100,000.
268
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
false statements regarding
Page 23 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
269
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
270
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
271
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
skimming device, or reencoder.
272
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
273
Page 24 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
274
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
consent.
275
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
276
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
violence.
277
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
278
Page 25 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
847.0137 3rd Transmission of pornography by
(2) & (3) electronic device or equipment.
279
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
280
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
281
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
282
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
283
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
Page 26 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
284
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
285
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
Page 27 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 17 2026
religious services or a
specified business site.
286
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
public housing facility.
287
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
288
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
289
290 Section 7. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 28 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb17-01-c1